Alaska, session 34, HB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.21.020 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 44.21.020. Duties of department. The Department of Administration 06 shall 07 (1) make surveys and studies to improve administrative procedures, 08 methods, and organization; 09 (2) keep general accounts; 10 (3) approve vouchers and disburse funds for all purposes; 11 (4) operate centralized purchasing and supply services, and necessary 12 storerooms and warehouses; 13 (5) [REPEALED 14 (6)] supervise telephone, mailing, messenger, duplicating, and similar 01 services adaptable to centralized management; 02 (6) [(7)] administer the public employees' retirement system and 03 teachers' retirement system; 04 (7) [(8)] administer a statewide personnel program, including central 05 personnel services such as recruitment, assessment, position classification, and pay 06 administration; 07 (8) [(9)] administer and supervise a statewide automatic data 08 processing program; 09 (9) [(10)] study, design, implement, and manage the 10 telecommunications systems and services of the state under AS 44.21.305 - 44.21.330; 11 (10) establish and administer the address confidentiality program 12 under AS 44.21.022 [(11) REPEALED]. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 44.21 is amended by adding a new section to read: 14 Sec. 44.21.022. Address confidentiality program. (a) The address 15 confidentiality program is established in the department to protect the confidentiality 16 of the address of an individual enrolled in the program. 17 (b) The department shall 18 (1) establish and administer the program; 19 (2) designate a post office box as a substitute mailing address for an 20 individual enrolled in the program; 21 (3) forward the mail of an individual enrolled in the program from the 22 post office box designated under (2) of this subsection to the individual's residential 23 street address, post office box, school address, or work address as specified on the 24 individual's application for enrollment in the program; 25 (4) maintain the confidentiality of the address of an individual enrolled 26 in the program; and 27 (5) adopt regulations establishing a procedure for a qualified individual 28 under (c) of this section to enroll in or withdraw from the program. 29 (c) The following individuals may enroll in the program: 30 (1) a victim of a crime involving domestic violence, stalking, human 31 trafficking, sex trafficking, or sexual assault if 01 (A) a court has issued a protective order on behalf of the 02 victim; or 03 (B) the victim meets other standards set by the department; 04 (2) a guardian of a minor, if a court has issued a protective order on 05 behalf of the minor; 06 (3) a peace officer; 07 (4) a correctional officer; and 08 (5) a household member of an individual specified under (1) - (4) of 09 this subsection who is enrolled in the program. 10 (d) Notwithstanding (c) of this section, a person with a duty to register under 11 AS 12.63.010 may not enroll in the program. 12 (e) A state or municipal agency shall allow an individual enrolled in the 13 program to use the post office box designated by the department under (b)(2) of this 14 section as the individual's mailing address. 15 (f) The length of initial enrollment in the program is five years. If an 16 individual enrolled in the program does not renew the individual's enrollment in the 17 program every five years, the department shall remove the individual from the 18 program. The department shall remove an individual enrolled in the program if, during 19 the time of the individual's enrollment in the program, the individual is required to 20 register under AS 12.63.010. 21 (g) The department may not collect a registration fee from an individual 22 qualified under (c) of this section to enroll in the program. 23 (h) The department shall disclose an individual's address to a peace officer in 24 response to a search warrant issued by a state or federal court. 25 (i) A person who discloses information that is confidential under this section 26 about an individual enrolled in the program under (c) of this section is guilty of a class 27 B misdemeanor if the person 28 (1) is authorized to access the address confidentiality program database 29 and recklessly discloses the information to the respondent of a protective order; 30 (2) is not authorized to access the address confidentiality program 31 database and knowingly discloses the information to the respondent of a protective 01 order; or 02 (3) accesses the address confidentiality program database without 03 authorization to access the database and recklessly discloses the information. 04 (j) In this section, 05 (1) "correctional officer" means a person 06 (A) appointed by the commissioner of corrections whose 07 primary duty under AS 33.30 is to provide custody, care, security, control, and 08 discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses against the state or held 09 under authority of state law; 10 (B) employed in a correctional facility in this state whose 11 primary duty is to provide custody, care, security, control, and discipline of 12 persons charged or convicted of offenses or held under authority of law; or 13 (C) employed full time in a municipal correctional facility 14 whose primary duty is to provide custody, care, security, control, and 15 discipline of persons charged or convicted of offenses or held under authority 16 of law, and the correctional facility is located in a municipality that has 17 adopted AS 18.65.130 - 18.65.290 by ordinance under AS 18.65.285; 18 (2) "crime involving domestic violence" has the meaning given in 19 AS 18.66.990; 20 (3) "department" means the Department of Administration; 21 (4) "household member" means an adult or minor who lives in the 22 same residence as an individual enrolled in the program; 23 (5) "peace officer" has the meaning given in AS 01.10.060; 24 (6) "program" means the address confidentiality program. 25 * Sec. 3. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 26 read: 27 TRANSITION: REGULATIONS. The Department of Administration may adopt 28 regulations necessary to implement AS 44.21.022, enacted by sec. 2 of this Act. The 29 regulations take effect under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) but not before the 30 effective date of the law being implemented by the regulation. 31 * Sec. 4. Section 3 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 01 * Sec. 5. Except as provided in sec. 4 of this Act, this Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.